Maryland, session 2025, HB1310.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
15–601.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Board” means the State Board of Pharmacy.
(c) “DISPENSE” MEANS TO PROVIDE:
(1) A PRESCRIPTION DRUG OR MEDICAL SUPPLY IN ACCORDANCE
WITH A PRESCRIPTION; OR
(2) AN OVER–THE–COUNTER DRUG OR MEDICAL SUPPLY.
(D) “Drop–off site” means a pharmacy or, other health care facility, OR OTHER
ENTITY PARTICIPATING IN A DRUG DONATION OR REPOSITORY PROGRAM AND
designated by the Board that:
(1) Has voluntarily agreed to accept donated prescription drugs,
OVER–THE–COUNTER DRUGS, or medical supplies; and
(2) IS LOCATED WITHIN THE STATE OR IN ANOTHER STATE; AND
(3) Does not have a final disciplinary order issued against it by a health
occupations board.
(D) “LICENSED PHARMACY” MEANS A PHARMACY LICENSED BY THE BOARD
OR A PHARMACY LICENSED IN ANOTHER STATE.
[(d)] (E) “ELIGIBLE PATIENT” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO, THROUGH
SELF–ATTESTATION, IS INDIGENT, UNINSURED, UNDERINSURED, OR ENROLLED IN A
PUBLIC HEALTH BENEFITS PROGRAM.

HOUSE BILL 1310 3
(F) “Program” means the Prescription Drug Repository Program.
[(e)] (F) (G) “Repository” means a licensed pharmacy that:
(1) Does IF THE LICENSED PHARMACY IS LOCATED IN THE STATE,
DOES not have a final disciplinary order issued against it by the Board of Pharmacy OR,
FOR AN OUT–OF–STATE LICENSED PHARMACY, THE APPLICABLE REGULATORY
AUTHORITY;
(2) Has voluntarily agreed to participate in the Program; and
(3) IS LOCATED IN THE STATE OR IN ANOTHER STATE; AND
(4) Has been approved by the Board to:
(i) Accept donated prescription drugs, OVER–THE–COUNTER
DRUGS, or medical supplies from a designated drop–off site;
(ii) Dispense the donated prescription drugs, OVER–THE–COUNTER
DRUGS, or medical supplies to needy individuals ELIGIBLE PATIENTS; or
(iii) Dispose of prescription drugs, OVER–THE–COUNTER DRUGS, or
medical supplies not accepted for dispensing to needy individuals ELIGIBLE PATIENTS.
(H) “TAMPER–EVIDENT PACKAGING” MEANS A PACKAGING SYSTEM THAT:
(1) MAY INVOLVE AN IMMEDIATE–CONTAINER AND CLOSURE SYSTEM,
SECONDARY–CONTAINER OR CARTON SYSTEM, TERTIARY–CONTAINER SYSTEM, OR
OTHER COMBINATION OF SYSTEMS INTENDED TO PROVIDE A VISUAL INDICATION OF
PACKAGE INTEGRITY;
(2) MAY CONTAIN UNIT–DOSE OR MULTI–DOSE CONTENTS; AND
(3) HAS ONE OR MORE INDICATORS OR BARRIERS TO ENTRY THAT:
(I) IF BREACHED OR MISSING, CAN REASONABLY BE EXPECTED
TO PROVIDE VISIBLE EVIDENCE TO CONSUMERS THAT TAMPERING HAS OCCURRED;
AND
(II) IF HANDLED IN A REASONABLE MANNER DURING
MANUFACTURE, DISTRIBUTION, OR RETAIL DISPLAY, IS DESIGNED TO REMAIN
INTACT.

HOUSE BILL 1310
15–602.
(a) There is a Prescription Drug Repository Program regulated by the Board.
(b) The purpose of the Program is to:
(1) Accept prescription drugs, OVER–THE–COUNTER DRUGS, and medical
supplies donated for the purpose of dispensing to [needy individuals] ELIGIBLE PATIENTS;
and
(2) Accept prescription drugs, OVER–THE–COUNTER DRUGS, and medical
supplies returned to a pharmacy for the purpose of proper disposal.
15–603.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, the Program may accept for
the purpose of dispensing only:
(1) Prescription drugs AND OVER–THE–COUNTER DRUGS in their
original unopened, sealed, and tamper–evident [unit dose] packaging, INCLUDING DRUGS
THAT HAVE BEEN PACKAGED BY A MANUFACTURER OR HAVE BEEN REPACKAGED BY
AN ENTITY AUTHORIZED TO REPACKAGE DRUGS IN THE STATE IN WHICH THE ENTITY
IS LOCATED; and
(2) Medical supplies in their original unopened and sealed packaging.
(b) The Program may accept and dispense prescription drugs AND
OVER–THE–COUNTER DRUGS packaged in single unit doses when the outside packaging
is opened if the single unit dose packaging is undisturbed.
(c) (1) The Program may not accept prescription drugs, OVER–THE–COUNTER
DRUGS, or medical supplies for dispensing that:
[(1)] (I) [Bear] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, BEAR an expiration date that is less than 90 days from the date the drug is
donated;
[(2)] (II) May be adulterated, according to the standards of § 21–216 of this
article; or
[(3)] (III) Belong to a category of unacceptable drugs established under §
15–608(b)(1) of this subtitle.
(2) (I) THE PROGRAM MAY ACCEPT PRESCRIPTION DRUGS AND
OVER–THE–COUNTER DRUGS THAT BEAR AN EXPIRATION DATE THAT IS LESS THAN

HOUSE BILL 1310 5
90 DAYS FROM THE DATE THE DRUG IS DONATED IF THE PRESCRIPTION DRUG OR
OVER–THE–COUNTER DRUG IS IN HIGH DEMAND.
(II) IF THE PROGRAM ACCEPTS A PRESCRIPTION DRUG OR
OVER–THE–COUNTER DRUG UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE
PROGRAM MAY NOT DISPENSE THE PRESCRIPTION DRUG OR OVER–THE–COUNTER
DRUG IF THE EXPIRATION DATE OCCURS DURING THE TIME PERIOD FOR WHICH THE
PRESCRIPTION DRUG OR OVER–THE–COUNTER DRUG IS PRESCRIBED.
15–604.
(a) (1) Any person may donate prescription drugs, OVER–THE–COUNTER
DRUGS, or medical supplies to the Program.
(2) THE PROGRAM MAY RECEIVE DONATED PRESCRIPTION DRUGS,
OVER–THE–COUNTER DRUGS, OR MEDICAL SUPPLIES FROM ANY PERSON.
(b) Prescription drugs, OVER–THE–COUNTER DRUGS, or medical supplies may
be donated only [at] TO a drop–off site designated for that purpose by the Board.
(c) A drop–off site LOCATED IN THE STATE shall:
(1) Require a donor to complete and sign a donor form releasing the
prescription drugs, OVER–THE–COUNTER DRUGS, or medical supplies to the Program;
(2) Store donated prescription drugs, OVER–THE–COUNTER DRUGS, and
medical supplies in a secure location used exclusively for the Program; and
(3) Forward, at the cost of the designated drop–off site, all donated
prescription drugs, OVER–THE–COUNTER DRUGS, and medical supplies to a [central]
repository.
(d) A drop–off site LOCATED IN THE STATE may not:
(1) Dispense donated prescription drugs, OVER–THE–COUNTER DRUGS,
or medical supplies;
(2) Resell prescription drugs, OVER–THE–COUNTER DRUGS, or medical
supplies donated to the Program; or
(3) Charge a fee for accepting a donation.
(E) CONSISTENT WITH ITS APPROVAL BY THE BOARD, AN ENTITY LOCATED
IN ANOTHER STATE:

HOUSE BILL 1310
(1) MAY PARTICIPATE IN THE PROGRAM AS A DROP–OFF SITE; AND
(2) MAY ACCEPT DONATED PRESCRIPTION DRUGS,
OVER–THE–COUNTER DRUGS, AND MEDICAL SUPPLIES FROM A PERSON, UNLESS
OTHERWISE PROHIBITED BY FEDERAL LAW OR THE LAWS OF THE STATE IN WHICH
THE ENTITY IS LOCATED.
15–605.
(a) The Board may approve Medbank of Maryland, Inc., or another A licensed
pharmacy, to be a repository.
(b) Consistent with its approval by the Board, a repository LOCATED IN THE
STATE shall:
(1) Accept only donated prescription drugs, OVER–THE–COUNTER
DRUGS, and medical supplies forwarded by designated drop–off sites;
(2) Inspect all donated prescription drugs, OVER–THE–COUNTER DRUGS,
and medical supplies;
(3) Accept for dispensing to needy individuals ELIGIBLE PATIENTS only
those donated prescription drugs, OVER–THE–COUNTER DRUGS, and medical supplies
that meet the requirements of § 15–603 of this subtitle;
(4) Dispose of donated prescription drugs, OVER–THE–COUNTER DRUGS,
and medical supplies not accepted for dispensing to needy individuals ELIGIBLE PATIENTS
in accordance with State and federal law;
(5) Maintain a separate inventory of donated prescription drugs,
OVER–THE–COUNTER DRUGS, and medical supplies;
(6) Store donated prescription drugs, OVER–THE–COUNTER DRUGS, and
medical supplies in a secure location used exclusively for the Program;
(7) Maintain separate prescription files for patients receiving donated
prescription drugs and medical supplies; and
(8) Obliterate from the labels of donated prescription drugs and medical
supplies any information specific to the patient for whom the donated prescription drugs,
OVER–THE–COUNTER DRUGS, and medical supplies were originally dispensed OR
OTHERWISE PROVIDED TO THE PATIENT.
(c) A repository LOCATED IN THE STATE shall dispense donated prescription
drugs, OVER–THE–COUNTER DRUGS, and medical supplies only:

HOUSE BILL 1310 7
(1) To an individual who meets the requirements of § 15–606 § 15–606(A)
of this subtitle;
(2) On a new prescription, in the case of a prescription drug or medical
supply that requires a prescription; and
(3) In accordance with State and federal laws pertaining to:
(i) Storage, distribution, and dispensing of prescription drugs; and
(ii) Confidentiality of patient information.
(d) A repository LOCATED IN THE STATE may:
(1) Charge a fee, not to exceed $10, for each prescription drug,
OVER–THE–COUNTER DRUG, or medical supply dispensed; and
(2) Dispense a donated prescription drug, OVER–THE–COUNTER DRUG,
or medical supply by mail, provided that the repository informs the patient that a delay
may be entailed.
(e) A repository may not establish or maintain a waiting list for any prescription
drug, OVER–THE–COUNTER DRUG, or medical supply dispensed by the Program.
(f) A pharmacy may accept prescription drugs, OVER–THE–COUNTER DRUGS,
and medical supplies taken to the pharmacy for disposal only if the pharmacy is approved
by the Board as a repository for this purpose.
(g) CONSISTENT WITH ITS APPROVAL BY THE BOARD, AN ENTITY LOCATED
IN ANOTHER STATE:
(1) MAY PARTICIPATE IN THE PROGRAM AS A REPOSITORY; AND
(2) SHALL DISPENSE DONATED PRESCRIPTION DRUGS,
OVER–THE–COUNTER DRUGS, AND MEDICAL SUPPLIES TO RESIDENTS OF THE STATE
ONLY IN ACCORDANCE WITH:
(I) FEDERAL LAW;
(II) LAWS OF THE STATE IN WHICH THE ENTITY IS LOCATED
PERTAINING TO STORAGE AND DISTRIBUTION OF PRESCRIPTION DRUGS,
OVER–THE–COUNTER DRUGS, AND MEDICAL SUPPLIES; AND
(III) STATE LAWS PERTAINING TO NONRESIDENT PHARMACIES.

HOUSE BILL 1310
(H) The Program may not require a private entity to establish, operate, or fund a
drop–off site or disposal program.
(h) (I) The Department shall develop a process for providing information about the
availability of the State’s earned income tax credit established under § 10–704 of the Tax –
General Article to each individual receiving donated prescription drugs and medical
supplies from the A repository.
(J) A PERSON DONATING, TRANSFERRING, OR RECEIVING PRESCRIPTION
DRUGS, OVER–THE–COUNTER DRUGS, AND MEDICAL SUPPLIES, OR FACILITATING
THE DONATION, TRANSFER, OR RECEIPT, IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBTITLE MAY
NOT BE REQUIRED TO HOLD A WHOLESALE DISTRIBUTION LICENSE.
(K) A REPOSITORY LOCATED IN ANOTHER STATE OPERATING PRIMARILY
FOR THE PURPOSE OF PARTICIPATING IN A DRUG DONATION OR REPOSITORY
PROGRAM MAY NOT BE REQUIRED TO POSSESS A COMPREHENSIVE OR MINIMUM
SUPPLY OF PRESCRIPTION DRUGS, OVER–THE–COUNTER DRUGS, OR MEDICAL
SUPPLIES.
(L) A REPOSITORY LOCATED IN THE STATE MAY TRANSFER DONATED
PRESCRIPTION DRUGS, OVER–THE–COUNTER DRUGS, AND MEDICAL SUPPLIES TO:
(1) ANOTHER REPOSITORY LOCATED IN THE STATE; OR
(2) A DROP–OFF SITE LOCATED IN ANOTHER STATE, A REPOSITORY
LOCATED IN ANOTHER STATE, OR ANOTHER ENTITY LOCATED IN ANOTHER STATE
THAT PARTICIPATES IN A DRUG DONATION OR REPOSITORY PROGRAM IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THE LAWS OF THE STATE IN WHICH THE ENTITY IS LOCATED
ONLY IF THERE IS NO NEED FOR THE DONATED PRESCRIPTION DRUGS,
OVER–THE–COUNTER DRUGS, OR MEDICAL SUPPLIES FOR USE BY ELIGIBLE
PATIENTS IN THE STATE, AS DETERMINED BY THE TRANSFERRING REPOSITORY.
(M) UNLESS OTHERWISE PROHIBITED BY FEDERAL LAW OR THE LAWS OF
THE STATE IN WHICH IT IS LOCATED, A DROP–OFF SITE OR REPOSITORY LOCATED IN
ANOTHER STATE MAY PERFORM AND RECEIVE:
(1) INTRACOMPANY TRANSFERS OF DONATED PRESCRIPTION DRUGS,
OVER–THE–COUNTER DRUGS, AND MEDICAL SUPPLIES; AND
(2) TRANSFERS OF DONATED PRESCRIPTION DRUGS,
OVER–THE–COUNTER DRUGS, AND MEDICAL SUPPLIES FROM DROP–OFF SITES
LOCATED IN ANOTHER STATE, REPOSITORIES LOCATED IN ANOTHER STATE, OR

HOUSE BILL 1310 9
OTHER ENTITIES PARTICIPATING IN A DRUG DONATION OR REPOSITORY PROGRAM
IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE LAWS OF THE STATE IN WHICH THE ENTITY IS LOCATED.
15–606.
(A) To be eligible to receive donated prescription drugs, OVER–THE–COUNTER
DRUGS, or medical supplies FROM A REPOSITORY LOCATED IN THE STATE, an
individual [shall] MUST:
(1) Be a resident of the State; and
(2) Be [a needy] AN ELIGIBLE patient[, as indicated by the individual’s
health care practitioner].
(B) TO BE ELIGIBLE TO RECEIVE DONATED PRESCRIPTION DRUGS,
OVER–THE–COUNTER DRUGS, OR MEDICAL SUPPLIES FROM A REPOSITORY LOCATED
IN ANOTHER STATE, AN INDIVIDUAL MUST BE AN ELIGIBLE PATIENT.
15–607.
(a) This section applies to:
(1) A person that donates prescription drugs, OVER–THE–COUNTER
DRUGS, or medical supplies to the Program;
(2) A drop–off site;
(3) A repository;
(4) The Board; and
(5) Pharmacists;
(6) PHARMACY TECHNICIANS; AND
(7) STAFF EMPLOYED BY OR VOLUNTEERING FOR AN ENTITY
PARTICIPATING IN THE PROGRAM.
(b) For matters related to donating, accepting, TRANSFERRING, disposing of, or
dispensing prescription drugs, OVER–THE–COUNTER DRUGS, or medical supplies under
the Program, OR FACILITATING THE DONATION, ACCEPTANCE, TRANSFER,
DISPOSITION OF, OR DISPENSING, a person described in subsection (a) of this section
that acts in good faith may not be subject to:
(1) Criminal prosecution; or

HOUSE BILL 1310
(2) Liability in tort or other civil action for injury, death, or loss to person
or property.
(c) A drug manufacturer acting in good faith may not be subject to criminal
prosecution or liability in tort or other civil action for injury, death, or loss to person or
property for matters related to the donation, acceptance, or dispensing of a drug
manufactured by the drug manufacturer that is donated by any person under the Program,
including liability for failure to transfer or communicate product or consumer information
or the expiration date of the donated drug.
15–608.
(a) On or before January 1, 2007, and in consideration of the recommendations of
the Task Force on the Establishment of a Prescription Drug Repository Program, the Board
shall adopt regulations governing the Program.
(b) The regulations shall include:
(1) Categories of drugs that a repository will not accept, including a
statement as to why the drug is ineligible for donation;
(2) A standard form each donor DONATING TO A DROP–OFF SITE
LOCATED IN THE STATE must sign stating that the donor is the owner of the drugs and
intends to voluntarily donate them to the Program;
(3) Requirements for designation of drop–off sites to accept donated
prescription drugs, OVER–THE–COUNTER DRUGS, and medical supplies under the
Program;
(4) Requirements for designation of repositories to dispense or dispose of
donated prescription drugs, OVER–THE–COUNTER DRUGS, and medical supplies under
the Program;
(5) Standards and procedures for DROP–OFF SITES AND REPOSITORIES
LOCATED IN THE STATE RELATED TO accepting, safely storing, dispensing, shipping, and
disposing of donated prescription drugs, OVER–THE–COUNTER DRUGS, and medical
supplies;
(6) Standards and procedures for REPOSITORIES LOCATED IN THE
STATE RELATED TO inspecting donated prescription drugs, OVER–THE–COUNTER
DRUGS, and medical supplies intended for dispensing to determine that:
(i) The [original packaging is:
1. Sealed and tamper–evident; and

HOUSE BILL 1310 11
2. In the case of prescription drugs, in the undisturbed single
unit dose packaging; and] PRESCRIPTION DRUGS AND OVER–THE–COUNTER DRUGS
ARE IN ORIGINAL UNOPENED, SEALED, AND TAMPER–EVIDENT PACKAGING, WHICH
MAY INCLUDE PACKAGING PLACED BY THE MANUFACTURER AND PACKAGING PLACED
BY AN ENTITY AUTHORIZED TO REPACKAGE DRUGS IN THE STATE IN WHICH THE
ENTITY IS LOCATED;
(ii) The MEDICAL SUPPLIES ARE IN THEIR ORIGINAL UNOPENED
AND SEALED PACKAGING; AND
(III) THE prescription drugs, OVER–THE–COUNTER DRUGS, and
medical supplies are unadulterated, safe, and suitable for dispensing;
(7) [A standard form for health care practitioners to submit to a repository
to indicate a patient’s need for the Program;
(8)] A standard form that an individual receiving a prescription drug,
OVER–THE–COUNTER DRUG, or medical supply from [the Program] A REPOSITORY
LOCATED IN THE STATE must sign before receiving the drug or supply to confirm that the
individual understands that:
(i) The individual is receiving prescription drugs,
OVER–THE–COUNTER DRUGS, or medical supplies that have been donated to the Program;
and
(ii) Entities involved in the Program have certain immunity from
liability;
[(9)] (8) Record keeping and reporting requirements for a repository
LOCATED IN THE STATE; and
[(10)] (9) Any other standards and procedures the Board considers
appropriate FOR DROP–OFF SITES AND REPOSITORIES LOCATED IN THE STATE.
15–609.
(a) A repository LOCATED IN THE STATE shall:
(1) Maintain WRITTEN OR ELECTRONIC records of donated prescription
drugs, OVER–THE–COUNTER DRUGS, and medical supplies; and
(2) Submit periodic reports to the Board on its activities.

HOUSE BILL 1310
(b) To determine compliance with the requirements of this subtitle, the Board
shall:
(1) Inspect designated drop–off sites and repositories LOCATED IN THE
STATE;
(2) Inspect records of donated prescription drugs, OVER–THE–COUNTER
DRUGS, and medical supplies maintained by the repository REPOSITORIES LOCATED IN
THE STATE; and
(3) Beginning January 1, 2007, and each January 1 thereafter, report to
the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the
General Assembly on the operation of the Program.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.